Alabama, session 2026rs, HB42.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 32-8-84 of the Code of Alabama 1975,
is amended to read as follows:
"§32-8-84
(a) The following shall be considered an unclaimed
motor vehicle:
(1) A motor vehicle left unattended on a public road or
highway for more than 48 hours.
(2) A motor vehicle, not left on private property for
repairs, that has remained on private or other public property
for a period of more than 48 hours without the consent of the
owner or lessee of the property.
(3) A motor vehicle, left on private property for
repairs, that has not been reclaimed within 48 hours from the
latter of either the date the repairs were completed or the
agreed upon redemption date.
(b)(1) AExcept as otherwise provided in subdivision
(2), a person, as defined in Section 40-12-240, in possession
of an unclaimed motor vehicle shall report the motor vehicle
as unclaimed to the Department of Revenue within five calendar
days from the date the motor vehicle first was considered
unclaimed.
Page 1

unclaimed.
HB42 Enrolled
(2) A person in possession of a towed motor vehicle may
report the vehicle to the Department of Revenue immediately
after towing the vehicle.
(3) The report shall be made in a manner as prescribed
by the department on the Unclaimed/Abandoned Vehicle Portal
maintained by the Department of Revenue.
(c)(1) Upon receiving notice as required in subsection
(b), the department shall place a 60-calendar day hold on the
title record and no title shall be issued during that time
period unless the title transaction occurred prior to the date
the motor vehicle was deemed unclaimed or the motor vehicle
was returned to the recorded owner or lienholder of record, if
any.
(2) If the motor vehicle was returned to the recorded
owner or lienholder of record, if any, prior to the conclusion
of the hold period on the title record, the person who
reported the motor vehicle as unclaimed shall report the
return of the motor vehicle within five calendar days in a
manner as prescribed by the department.
(d)(1) A person in possession of an unclaimed motor
vehicle, upon reporting the motor vehicle as unclaimed to the
department, shall utilize the National Motor Vehicle Title
Information System (NMVTIS) to determine the current title
state of record or, if no current title exists for the motor
vehicle, the most recent state of registration for the motor
vehicle. Thereafter, the person shall submit a records request
to the state of record within five calendar days from the date
the motor vehicle was reported as unclaimed to the department.
Page 2

the motor vehicle was reported as unclaimed to the department.
HB42 Enrolled
(2) The records request shall be sent to the current
title state of record in order to obtain the name and address
of the owner and lienholder of record, if any. If no current
title exists, the records request shall be sent to the most
recent state of registration in order to obtain the name and
address of the owner.
(3)a. In the event that no NMVTIS record exists and
there is evidence that could be reasonably ascertained by the
person indicating that the motor vehicle has been registered
in another state, the person, within five calendar days from
the date the motor vehicle was reported as unclaimed to the
department, shall submit a records request to the state of
registration in order to obtain the name and address of the
owner. Thereafter, the person shall send notice by certified
mail with either return receipt requested or electronic
delivery confirmation, within five calendar days from receipt
of the title record, to the owner and lienholder of record, if
any, or registration record, to the owner of record, advising
the owner and lienholder of record, if any, of all of the
following:
1. theThe location of the motor vehicle,.
2. The normal business hours of the facility holding
the motor vehicle,.
3. anyAny accrued charges or fees,.
4. theThe daily storage rate,.
5. and theThe mailing address and contact telephone
number of the person in possession of the motor vehicle.
b. The notice required in paragraph a. shall include
Page 3

b. The notice required in paragraph a. shall include
HB42 Enrolled
the following language in no smaller than 10 point type: "If
this motor vehicle is not redeemed by the recorded owner or
lienholder of record within 30 calendar days from the date of
this notice, the motor vehicle shall be considered abandoned
as defined in Section 32-13-1, Code of Alabama 1975. The motor
vehicle may then be sold pursuant to the provisions of the
Alabama Abandoned Motor Vehicle Act as provided for in Title
32, Chapter 13, Code of Alabama 1975."
(4) A person who fails to report a motor vehicle as
unclaimed or fails to notify the owner and lienholder of
record, if any, in accordance with this subsection shall
forfeit all claims and liens for the motor vehicle's garaging,
parking, and storage prior to the time the motor vehicle is
reported as unclaimed; provided, however, failure to report
shall not result in the forfeiture of claims and liens for the
100 towing and repair of a motor vehicle.
101 (e)(1) The department shall maintain and appropriately
102 index public records of unclaimed motor vehicles reported to
103 it pursuant to this section. The department may provide lists
104 of the vehicle identification numbers for such the motor
105 vehicles without fee in a manner as the department prescribes.
106 (2) The department shall provide notice of unclaimed
107 motor vehicles to law enforcement.
108 (3) Notice shall also be provided to the person
109 individual who reported the motor vehicle as unclaimed if it
110 the motor vehicle has been reported as stolen to law
111 enforcement.
112 (f)(1) The department may suspend the registration of a
Page 4

(f)(1) The department may suspend the registration of a
HB42 Enrolled
113 vehicle whose theft or conversion is reported to it the
114 department pursuant to this section. Until the department
115 learns of itsthe recovery of the motor vehicle or that the
116 report of itsthe motor vehicle's theft or conversion was
117 erroneous, itthe department shall not issue a certificate of
118 title for the motor vehicle.
119 (2) A title shall be issued by the department in the
120 name of an insurance company on a vehicle that is reported
121 stolen when a settlement between the insured and his or herthe
122 insured's insurance company has occurred. The title shall be
123 issued electronically in the name of the insurance company
124 until the vehicle has been recovered, and, if recovered, the
125 title may be issued in paper form."
126 Section 2. This act shall become effective October 1,
127 2026.
Page 5

2026.
HB42 Enrolled
128
129
130
131
132
133
134
135
136
137
138 ________________________________________________
139 Speaker of the House of Representatives
140
141
142
143 ________________________________________________
144 President and Presiding Officer of the Senate
145
146
147 House of Representatives
148
149 I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
150 was passed by the House 22-Jan-26.
151
152 John Treadwell
153 Clerk
154
155
156
157
158
159 Senate 05-Mar-26 Passed
160
161
162
Page 6